Georgia, session 2025_26, HB902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to insurance, is amended in
Chapter 9, relating to regulation of rates, underwriting rules, and related organizations, by
revising Code Section 33-9-4, relating to standards applicable to making and use of rates, as
follows:
"33-9-4.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
H. B. 902
- 1 -

LC 52 0851
(1) 'Excessive' means the rate is likely to produce a long-term profit that is unreasonably
high in relation to the insurance coverage provided. Any rate increase of 10 percent or
more within any 12 month period and any filing for a rate increase two or more times
within any 24 month period shall be presumed to be excessive.
(2) 'Inadequate' means the rate is insufficient to sustain projected losses and expenses to
which the rate applies and continued use of the rate endangers the solvency of the insurer
or has the effect of substantially lessening competition or creating a monopoly in a
market.
(3) 'Unfairly discriminatory' means the rate is not based on sound actuarial principles,
does not bear a reasonable relationship to the expected loss and expense experience
among risks, or is based wholly or partly on the race, creed, color, ethnicity, or national
origin of the applicant, policyholder, or insured.
(b) The following standards shall apply to the making and use of rates pertaining to all
classes of insurance to which this chapter is applicable:
(1) Rates shall not be excessive, or inadequate, or as defined in this Code section, nor
shall they be unfairly discriminatory;
(2) No rate shall be held to be excessive unless such rate is unreasonably high for the
insurance provided and a reasonable degree of competition does not exist in the area with
respect to the classification to which such rate is applicable; provided, however, with
respect to rate filings involving an increase in rates, no rate for personal private passenger
motor vehicle insurance shall be held to be excessive unless such rate is unreasonably
high for the insurance provided and a reasonable degree of competition does not exist;
(3) No rate shall be held inadequate unless it is unreasonably low for the insurance
provided and continued use of it would endanger solvency of the insurer, or unless the
use of such rate by the insurer using such rate has, or will, if continued, tend to destroy
competition or create a monopoly;
H. B. 902
- 2 -

LC 52 0851
(4)(2) Consideration shall be given to the extent applicable to past and prospective loss
experience within and outside this state, to conflagration and catastrophe hazards, to a
reasonable margin for underwriting profit and contingencies, to past and prospective
expenses both country wide and those specially applicable to this state, to the insurer's
average yield from investment income, and to all other factors, including judgment
factors, deemed relevant within and outside this state; and, in the case of fire insurance
rates, consideration may be given to the experience of the fire insurance business during
the most recent five-year period;
(5)(3) Consideration may also be given, in the making and use of rates, to dividends,
savings, or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or returned by insurers to their
policyholders, members, or subscribers;
(6)(4) The systems of expense provisions included in the rates for use by any insurer or
group of insurers may differ from those of other insurers or groups of insurers to reflect
the operating methods of any such insurer or group with respect to any kind of insurance
or with respect to any subdivision or combination thereof;
(7)(5) Risks may be grouped by classifications for the establishment of rates and
minimum premiums. Classification rates may be modified to produce rates for individual
risks in accordance with rating plans which establish standards for measuring variations
in hazards or expense provisions, or both. Such standards may measure any difference
among risks that have a probable effect upon losses or expenses. Classifications or
modifications of classifications of risks may be established based upon size, expense,
management, individual experience, location or dispersion of hazard, or any other
reasonable considerations. Such classifications and modifications shall apply to all risks
under the same or substantially the same circumstances or conditions; provided, however,
the Commissioner shall establish the maximum amount of any such modification;
(8)(6) Nothing contained in this Code section or elsewhere in this chapter shall be
construed to repeal or modify Chapter 6 of this title, relating to unfair trade practices, and
H. B. 902
- 3 -

LC 52 0851
any rate, rating classification, rating plan or schedule, or variation thereof established in
violation of Chapter 6 of this title shall, in addition to the consequences stated in Chapter
6 of this title or elsewhere, be deemed violative of to violate this Code section;
(9)(7) No insurer shall base any standard or rating plan on vehicle insurance, in whole
or in part, directly or indirectly, upon race, creed, or ethnic extraction; and
(10)(8) No insurer shall base any standard or rating plan on vehicle insurance, in whole
or in part, directly or indirectly, upon any physical disability of an insured unless the
disability directly impairs the ability of the insured to drive a motor vehicle."
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising subsection (e) of Code
Section 33-9-21, relating to maintenance and filing rates, rating plans, rating systems, or
underwriting rules and examination of claim reserve practices by the Commissioner, as
follows:
"(e)(1) When a rate filing of an insurer required under subsection (d) of this Code section
results in any overall rate increase of 10 percent or more within any 12 month period or
when an insurer files for a rate increase more than two times within any 24 month period,
the Commissioner shall order an a financial and market conduct examination of that
insurer to determine the accuracy of the claim reserves, the applicability of the claim
reserve practices for the loss data used in support of such filing, and any other component
of the rate filing, such insurer's compliance with federal and state laws and regulations,
and such insurer's marketing practices, claims handling, complaint handling, and
policyholder service; provided, however, that in the event the overall increase is less than
25 percent within any 12 month period and the Commissioner affirmatively determines
that he or she has sufficient information to evaluate such rate increase and that the cost
thereof would not be justified, he or she may waive all or part of such examination. In
all other rate filings required under subsection (d) of this Code section, the Commissioner
H. B. 902
- 4 -

LC 52 0851
may order an a financial and market conduct examination of that insurer as provided in
this subsection. Such examination shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions
of Chapter 2 of this title. Upon notification by the Commissioner of his or her intent to
conduct such examination, the insurer shall be prohibited from placing the rates so filed
in effect until such examination has been reviewed and certified by the Commissioner as
100 being complete. Such examination, if conducted by the Commissioner, shall be reviewed
101 and certified within 90 45 days of the date such rate, rating plan, rating system, or
102 underwriting rule is filed; provided, however, that, if the Commissioner makes an
103 affirmative finding that the examination may not be completed within the 90 day such
104 period, he or she may extend such time for one additional 60 45 day period.
105 (2) The Commissioner shall conduct a public hearing within 30 days of the completion
106 of any examination conducted pursuant to this subsection. The Commissioner shall be
107 authorized to take depositions, subpoena witnesses, administer oaths or affirmations,
108 examine any individual under oath, and compel the production of records, books, papers,
109 and other documents, including, but not limited to, a detailed actuarial report
110 demonstrating the necessity of the proposed rate increase based on claims trends, risk
111 factors, and financial solvency; a breakdown of administrative expenses, claim costs, and
112 anticipated profit margins; a statement on how the proposed rate increase shall affect
113 policyholders, including families, small businesses, and commercial enterprises in this
114 state; historical past rate changes and corresponding justifications for the preceding five
115 years; and any other documents deemed necessary. Any examination hearing required
116 under this Code section subsection shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 2 of
117 this title."
118 SECTION 3.
119 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 33-9-41, which is
120 designated as reserved, as follows:
H. B. 902
- 5 -

LC 52 0851
121 "33-9-41.
122 (a) On and after July 1, 2026, the Commissioner shall maintain on the department's
123 website in a readily accessible format any rate increases in insurance plans, as
124 demonstrated by the percentage increase from the prior year's premium, based on rates,
125 rating plans, rating systems, and underwriting rules filed pursuant to Code Section 33-9-21.
126 Such data shall be organized by line of insurance and by insurer and shall indicate whether
127 an examination or hearing was conducted.
128 (b) On and after July 1, 2026, any domestic, foreign, or alien insurer that is authorized to
129 write insurance in this state shall publish on its website in a readily accessible format any
130 rate increases in insurance plans, as demonstrated by the percentage increase from the prior
131 year's premium, based on rates, rating plans, rating systems, and underwriting rules filed
132 pursuant to Code Section 33-9-21. Such insurer may offer any explanations for such rate
133 increases and may indicate when rates stayed the same or decreased.
134 (c) The data published as provided for in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall
135 be based on data in existence on or after January 1, 2019, and shall be updated annually and
136 whenever a rate is increased. Reserved."
137 SECTION 4.
138 Said title is further amended in Chapter 66, relating to data analysis for tort reform, by
139 revising subsection (a) of Code Section 33-66-5, relating to data requests, timing, and
140 limitations, as follows:
141 "(a) No later than July 1, 2024, and as often as necessary through July 1, 2029 2035, the
142 Commissioner shall request data from insurers, licensed rating organizations, and state
143 agencies for the Commissioner to make findings regarding the impact of tort lawsuits and
144 the assessment of tort related risks. The Commissioner may allow for the confidential
145 submission of such requested data via electronic means."
H. B. 902
- 6 -

LC 52 0851
146 SECTION 5.
147 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 33-66-7, relating to
148 subsequent reports, as follows:
149 "33-66-7.
150 (a) The Commissioner shall generate a subsequent report in substantially similar form to
151 the initial report provided for in Code Section 33-66-6, and such subsequent report shall
152 include but not be limited to:
153 (1) Historic and predictive trends based on submitted data;
154 (2) The effects of any enacted tort reform legislation, including any savings or other
155 benefits passed on to policyholders, the general public, and the state. Such findings may
156 be based on analysis of any data available to the Commissioner, including data submitted
157 to the Commissioner pursuant to Code Section 33-66-5 or the department pursuant to this
158 title, including, but not limited to, reported earned premiums, requests for rate increases,
159 the number of insurers issuing liability policies in this state or applying for or renewing
160 a certificate of authority in this state, and the number of insurers deleting lines of
161 business, withdrawing from the business of insurance, or surrendering a certificate of
162 authority in this state; and
163 (3) Any further determinations or recommendations for legislative action.
164 (b) No later than November 1, 2029, the Commissioner shall submit the subsequent report
165 provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section to the Governor's Office office, the
166 House Committee on Insurance, and the Senate Insurance and Labor Committee, and the
167 presiding officers of both houses of the General Assembly and shall notify legislators of
168 the General Assembly of the availability of such report. The Commissioner shall publish
169 such report on the department's website in a prominent location."
H. B. 902
- 7 -

LC 52 0851
170 SECTION 6.
171 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 33-66-8, relating to
172 repealer, as follows:
173 "33-66-8.
174 This chapter shall stand repealed in its entirety on January 1, 2030 2036."
175 SECTION 7.
176 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
177 without such approval.
178 SECTION 8.
179 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 902
- 8 -